dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.dic
vųzky/Aa
oni/Ab
žrěti/Af
plåtno/Ag
osmnadsęť/Ah
kogo/Am
barok/An
radio/Aq
běženec/Aj
odȯjdti/As
čij-nebųď/Au
boŕba/Al
stilj/Ae
angola/Al
šolk/An
govno/Ag
luč/Ae
nizky/Aa
dvadesęť/Ah
jedinnadsęť/Ah
vȯzhod/Ac
kråljevstvo/At
člověk/An
politik/Ad
kraj/Ae
devętnadsęť/Ah
pęť/Ah
paljto/At
trinadsęť/Ah
displej/Ae
sedmnadsęť/Ah
četyrinadsęť/Ah
ćudinec/Aj
odmstiti/Ak
sȯjųznik/Ad
kazahstan/Ac
měsęc/Ae
tabak/An
desęť/Ah
klej/Ae
evropa/Al
šestnadsęť/Ah
veto/At
gostiti/Ak
izglåsiti/Ar
srědnjevěčje/Ao
šesť/Ah
gumno/Ag
tridesęť/Ah
iran/Ac
boljšesť/Ap
råzpustiti/Ak
otec/Aj
jędro/At
snižka/Ai
oprostiti/Ak
video/Aq
pųť/Ap
gnoj/Ae
prorok/Ad
sprositi/Ar
kanada/Al
pętnadsęť/Ah
bedro/At
bljušč/Ae
fizika/Al
irak/An
dvanadsęť/Ah
futbol/Ac
garaž/Ae
devęť/Ah
kvasiti/Ar
geto/At
krestiti/Ak
motylik/Ad
mozambik/An
němec/Aj
ovoć/Ae
poljska/Al
četyridesęť/Ah
metro/At
krěposť/Ap
zdråvoohrånjeńje/Ao
ukrajina/Al
puč/Ae
blizky/Aa
aeronavtika/Al
il/Ac
mŕzky/Aa
izkusiti/Ar
porųčiteljstvo/At
donositi/Ar
imennik/Ad
žalosť/Ap
uměstiti/Ak
napoj/Ae
ukryvańje/Ao
prodavec/Aj
pritisk/An
pųtnik/Ad
kompletnosť/Ap
taliŕka/Ai
odnositi/Ar
steblo/At
litvanec/Aj
slęzk/An
afrika/Al
antarktida/Al
eksport/Ac
sųprovodeńje/Ao
izpustiti/Ak
ljudskosť/Ap
izȯjdti/As
obȯjdti/As
prěnositi/Ar
vnositi/Ar
råznositi/Ar
mstiti/Ak
učęstnik/Ad
koj-nebųď/Au
niščitelj/Ae
arešt/Ac
barvivo/At
migdalj/Ae
bojevnik/Ad
arktika/Al
prěměstiti/Ak
sȯglåsnosť/Ap
babuška/Ai
člověkoljubje/Ao
črvenec/Aj
dopustiti/Ak
dŕkatnik/Ad
hepatit/Ac
hodeńje/Ao
jednonočka/Ai
jutro/At
kråtkovidnosť/Ap
nebojaznik/Ad
prěnebrěžeńje/Ao
neustalosť/Ap
obrųčka/Ai
odprěti/Af
orųžjenosec/Aj
posědnik/Ad
povstanec/Aj
pracovitosť/Ap
prěključ/Ae
sěveroiztok/An
slizky/Aa
skųposť/Ap
slovenec/Aj
sporåzuměvańje/Ao
strižik/Ad
umorjenosť/Ap
uvažańje/Ao
izsměška/Ai
zagraničnik/Ad
jedvab/Ac
odzavisiti/Ar
sȯvrěmennik/Ad
ščęstnosť/Ap
aplodovańje/Ao
lěnivec/Aj
slovačka/Ai
škoľnik/Ad
iztok/An
kuba/Al
televiděńje/Ao
krasavec/Aj
izčistiti/Ak
venezuela/Al
puška/Ai
pŕvenstvo/At
imperfekt/Ac
koristnik/Ad
protivnosť/Ap
časovańje/Ao
čelik/An
futro/At
hrånjenec/Aj
izgnańje/Ao
izkositi/Ar
jasenj/Ae
katȯčka/Ai
konservativec/Aj
krzno/Ag
ukųsiti/Ar
nepȯlnomožnik/Ad
objem/Ac
obȯjdti/As
obȯjdti/As
odpustiti/Ak
plastik/An
pracodavec/Aj
svojevrěmennosť/Ap
proglåsiti/Ar
propustiti/Ak
råvnohalo/At
roptańje/Ao
sekretaŕka/Ai
služebnik/Ad
stežka/Ai
unižnosť/Ap
vnimańje/Ao
dȯlgočasiti/Ar
izměstiti/Ak
jedinačka/Ai
językotvorec/Aj
konnik/Ad
kriterij/Ae
povęzanosť/Ap
vključeńje/Ao
mazivo/At
měsiti/Ar
prěběglik/Ad
råznositi/Ar
tunec/Aj
věrolomnosť/Ap
napustiti/Ak
oprěti/Af
prěti/Af
pręžka/Ai
prostiti/Ak
rodopisec/Aj
sprěti/Af
spustiti/Ak
varjeńje/Ao
zapustiti/Ak
aritmetika/Al
geranj/Ae
golf/Ac
inostrånec/Aj
prostrěti/Af
råzprostrěti/Af
dvojtočka/Ai
zaměsiti/Ar
svědȯčstvo/At
provodnik/Ad
gajana/Al
beliz/Ac
samovlasťje/Ao
fosfor/Ac
cink/An
cin/Ac
platina/Al
vȯzvysiti/Ar
zlosť/Ap
nacizm/Ac
męsožerec/Aj
popustiti/Ak
personaž/Ae
ukrasiti/Ar
tajenstvo/At
skrob/Ac
čajka/Ai
varšava/Al
minsk/An
rim/Ac
etika/Al
protivrěčnosť/Ap
sråm/Ac
poprositi/Ar
abrakadabra/Al
agnostik/Ad
amonijak/An
avtomatika/Al
balast/Ac
bankrotstvo/At
bojec/Aj
brusiti/Ar
bŕvno/Ag
cvěteńje/Ao
čaška/Ai
črěvo/At
črnobylj/Ae
divina/Al
dŕzky/Aa
gųstiti/Ak
inohod/Ac
jedinec/Aj
kladivo/At
klåsiti/Ar
kokoška/Ai
kȯlzky/Aa
kopȯť/Ap
kovańje/Ao
lunatik/Ad
mastiti/Ak
miraž/Ae
motto/At
mukańje/Ao
muška/Ai
nagosť/Ap
nanositi/Ar
naprěti/Af
neznańje/Ao
nrěstiti/Ak
obnositi/Ar
omastiti/Ak
sněgurȯčka/Ai
strělec/Aj
valentnosť/Ap
vapno/Ag
vatikan/Ac
vestibulj/Ae
vměstiti/Ak
volapuk/An
zaščitnik/Ad
zodiak/An
gnojivo/At
rublj/Ae
flegma/Al
mučańje/Ao
stonožka/Ai
totalitarizm/Ac
neminujemosť/Ap
blekdžek/An
pověsiti/Ar
ljuljka/Ai
podȯjdti/As
studio/Aq
drågoukazatelj/Ae
vels/Ac
netolerantnosť/Ap
neudobstvo/At
estetika/Al
izkoristiti/Ak
žrěbec/Aj
podtaliŕka/Ai
izjavjeńje/Ao
pętno/Ag
prědavnik/Ad
neolit/Ac
evropejka/Ai
križenosec/Aj
pomelo/At
neporušimosť/Ap
dvoboj/Ae
obložka/Ai
aerodinamika/Al
jugoiztok/An
informatik/Ad
nadmnožstvo/At
podȯjdti/As
izpȯlnjeńje/Ao
češka/Ai
kosmetika/Al
pasians/Ac
arbitraž/Ae
